Idaho, session 2026, H0895.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The Legislature finds
that data centers, as defined in section 63-3622VV, Idaho Code, require sig-
nificant amounts of water, and, therefore, finds, for purposes of sections
42-202A and 42-222, Idaho Code, that the water required by data centers:
(a) Conflicts with the local public interest as defined in section
42-202B, Idaho Code;
(b) Is contrary to the conservation of water resources within the state
of Idaho; and
(c) Will adversely affect the local economy of the watershed or local
area within which the source of water for the proposed use originates,
in the case where the place of use is outside of the watershed or local
area where the source of water originates.
(2) The Legislature further finds that the director of the Department
of Water Resources is required to make findings related to these criteria
when evaluating a new appropriation or transfer of existing water rights for
data centers, and it is the intent of the Legislature for the director to
consider these legislative findings regarding the data center's consumptive
use and its impacts to Idaho's water supply.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 2, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-252, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-252. LIMITATIONS ON CONSUMPTIVE USE -- DATA CENTERS. Data centers,
as that term is defined in section 63-3622VV, Idaho Code, that begin con-
struction on or after July 1, 2026, may not use water for cooling purposes
as a consumptive use, unless the water is supplied by a municipal, water dis-
trict, or water and sewer district water system.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.